North Dakota statutes. TITLE 27 Judicial Branch of Government
CHAPTER 27-03 Clerk of Supreme Court

27-03-01.
Appointment of clerk of supreme court.

The supreme court shall appoint a clerk of the supreme court to perform duties assigned by the court. The court shall establish the clerk’s salary within the amount appropriated for salaries by the legislative assembly.

Source:

S.L. 1890, ch. 170, § 1; R.C. 1895, § 380; R.C. 1899, § 380; R.C. 1905, § 446; C.L. 1913, § 722; R.C. 1943, § 27-0301; S.L. 1989, ch. 382, § 2.

Cross-References.

Constitutional provision providing for appointment of a court administrator, see N.D. Const., Art. VI, § 3.

For provisions pertaining to the powers and duties of the clerk of the supreme court, see Administrative Rule 5, North Dakota Court Rules Annotated.

Collateral References.

Liability of clerk of court or his bond, for defaults and misfeasances of his assistants or deputies, 71 A.L.R.2d 1140.

27-03-02.
Clerk of supreme court — Oath — Deputy.

The clerk of the supreme court, before entering upon the clerk’s duties, shall qualify by taking the oath prescribed for civil officers. The clerk may appoint a deputy who shall take and subscribe the oath prescribed for civil officers and file the same in the supreme court. The clerk is responsible for the acts of the deputy.

Source:

S.L. 1890, ch. 170, § 2; R.C. 1895, § 381; R.C. 1899, § 381; R.C. 1905, § 447; C.L. 1913, § 723; R.C. 1943, § 27-0302; S.L. 1999, ch. 113, § 9.

Cross-References.

Bond of public officers, see §§ 44-01-07 to 44-01-14 and chapter 26.1-21.

Oath and bond of clerk, practice of law prohibited, duties of clerk, see N.D.R.App.P., Rule 45.

Oath of civil officers, see § 44-01-05.

Where bond is to be filed, see § 54-09-02.

27-03-03.
Salary of clerk of supreme court.

The salary of the clerk of the supreme court must be within the amount appropriated for salaries by the legislative assembly.

Source:

S.L. 1890, ch. 170, § 6; R.C. 1895, § 385; R.C. 1899, § 385; R.C. 1905, § 451; S.L. 1909, ch. 73, § 1; C.L. 1913, § 727; S.L. 1919, ch. 210, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 727; S.L. 1933, ch. 196, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 27-0303; S.L. 1945, ch. 264, § 12; 1947, ch. 233, § 1; 1949, ch. 314, § 13; 1957 Supp., § 27-0303; S.L. 1981, ch. 535, § 8.

27-03-04.
Mileage and expenses allowed clerk.

In addition to the salary provided for in section 27-03-03, the clerk of the supreme court shall receive for the clerk’s expenses in attending sessions of the supreme court, when held at points other than at the seat of government, the mileage and traveling expenses allowed by law to state officers.

Source:

S.L. 1890, ch. 170, § 9; R.C. 1895, § 388; R.C. 1899, § 388; R.C. 1905, § 454; C.L. 1913, § 730; R.C. 1943, § 27-0304.

27-03-05.
Fees to be charged and collected by clerk of supreme court.

The clerk of the supreme court shall charge and collect in advance a fee of one hundred twenty-five dollars upon the filing in the supreme court of the record in any cause upon appeal or upon the filing in the court of a petition in any cause seeking the exercise of the original court’s jurisdiction. In addition to the fee required by this section, the clerk of the supreme court shall charge and collect any electronic filing processing fee established by court rule for any matter filed in an electronic format.

Source:

S.L. 1890, ch. 170, § 7; R.C. 1895, § 386; R.C. 1899, § 386; R.C. 1905, § 452; C.L. 1913, § 728; S.L. 1923, ch. 194, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 728; R.C. 1943, § 27-0305; S.L. 1947, ch. 228, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 27-0305; S.L. 1971, ch. 297, § 3; 1973, ch. 93, § 2; 1995, ch. 2, § 10; 2003, ch. 265, § 1; 2007, ch. 273, § 1.

Cross-References.

May require fees to be paid in advance, see § 44-08-09.

27-03-06.
Fees to be deposited monthly with state treasurer.

The clerk of the supreme court shall keep an accurate account of all fees received by the clerk of the supreme court and shall deposit such fees monthly with the state treasurer.

Source:

S.L. 1890, ch. 170, § 8; R.C. 1895, § 387; R.C. 1899, § 387; R.C. 1905, § 453; C.L. 1913, § 729; I. M. Nov. 8, 1932, § 6; S.L. 1933, p. 505; S.L. 1933, ch. 196, § 2; R.C. 1943, § 27-0306; S.L. 1947, ch. 228, § 2; 1957 Supp., § 27-0306; S.L. 1971, ch. 297, § 4.

27-03-07.
Clerk personally to perform all duties — When deputy can act.

The clerk of the supreme court personally shall perform all the duties assigned to the clerk by law and by the rules of the supreme court. When the clerk is absent unavoidably or for any cause is unable to perform the clerk’s duties, the clerk’s deputy may perform the same.

Source:

S.L. 1890, ch. 170, § 4; R.C. 1895, § 383; R.C. 1899, § 383; R.C. 1905, § 449; C.L. 1913, § 725; R.C. 1943, § 27-0307.

Cross-References.

Duties of clerk, see N.D.R.App.P., Rule 45.

Member of state canvassing board, see § 16.1-15-33.

27-03-08.
Clerk of supreme court to procure necessary records, supplies, and furniture.

The clerk of the supreme court shall procure the necessary records, seal, stationery, postage, and furniture for the use of the supreme court, and the expenses thereof must be paid out of the moneys appropriated to the supreme court for that purpose.

Source:

S.L. 1890, ch. 170, § 3; R.C. 1895, § 382; R.C. 1899, § 382; R.C. 1905, § 448; C.L. 1913, § 724; R.C. 1943, § 27-0308.

27-03-09.
Clerk to furnish copy of syllabus of each decision to daily newspaper. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1977, ch. 257, § 2.

27-03-10.
Clerk to furnish copies of opinions, abstracts, and briefs to supreme court reporter. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 267, § 1.